test/src/dict-gt-yamls/V-01_laeaeqdw_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - lǟʼdõ: # Verb 1 'eng /est /fin lähteä' - full paradigm
     lǟʼdõ+V+Inf: lǟʼdõ
     lǟʼdõ+V+Ger: lǟʼdsõ
     lǟʼdõ+V+Sup: lǟʼmõ
     lǟʼdõ+V+Deb: lǟʼmõst
     lǟʼdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lǟʼb
     lǟʼdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: lǟʼd
     lǟʼdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lǟʼb
     lǟʼdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: lǟʼmõ
     lǟʼdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: lǟʼtõ
     lǟʼdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: lǟʼbõd
     lǟʼdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: lekš
     lǟʼdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: lekšt
     lǟʼdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: lekš
     lǟʼdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: lekšmõ
     lǟʼdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: lekšmā
     lǟʼdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: lekštõ
     lǟʼdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: lekštā
     lǟʼdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: lekštõ
     lǟʼdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: lekštā
     lǟʼdõ+V+Ind+Conneg+Sg: lǟʼ
     lǟʼdõ+V+Ind+Conneg+Pl1: lǟʼmõ
     lǟʼdõ+V+Ind+Conneg+Pl2: lǟʼtõ
     lǟʼdõ+V+Ind+Conneg+Pl3: lǟʼtõ
     lǟʼdõ+V+Cond+Sg1: lǟʼks
     lǟʼdõ+V+Cond+Sg2: lǟʼkst
     lǟʼdõ+V+Cond+Sg3: lǟʼks
     lǟʼdõ+V+Cond+Pl1: lǟʼksmõ
     lǟʼdõ+V+Cond+Pl2: lǟʼkstõ
     lǟʼdõ+V+Cond+Pl3: lǟʼkstõ
     lǟʼdõ+V+Cond+Conneg+Sg: lǟʼks
     lǟʼdõ+V+Cond+Conneg+Pl1: lǟʼksmõ
     lǟʼdõ+V+Cond+Conneg+Pl2: lǟʼkstõ
     lǟʼdõ+V+Cond+Conneg+Pl3: lǟʼkstõ
     lǟʼdõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: li
     lǟʼdõ+V+Imprt+Conneg+Sg2: li
     lǟʼdõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: ligīd
     lǟʼdõ+V+Imprt+Conneg+Pl2: ligīd
     lǟʼdõ+V+Jus+Sg: läkkõ
     lǟʼdõ+V+Jus+Conneg+Sg: läkkõ
     lǟʼdõ+V+Jus+Pl: läkkõd
     lǟʼdõ+V+Jus+Conneg+Pl: läkkõd
     lǟʼdõ+V+Quo+Sg: lēʼji
     lǟʼdõ+V+Quo+Conneg+Sg: lēʼji
     lǟʼdõ+V+Quo+Pl: lēʼjid
     lǟʼdõ+V+Quo+Conneg+Pl: lēʼjid
     lǟʼdõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg: lǟʼnd
     lǟʼdõ+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl: lǟʼnõd
     lǟʼdõ+V+Pss+PrfPrc: lǟʼdõd
     lǟʼdõ+V+Pss+PrsPrc: lǟʼdõb
     lǟʼdõ+V+NomAg: lēʼji
     lǟʼdõ+V+NomAct: lēʼmi
